Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201277-1615
Tax list; completion; controlling
account.

The tax list shall be completed by the county assessor. The tax lists shall be completed by carrying out
in a column by itself the consolidated tax as provided in section 77-1614,
with the labor tax, and any irregular tax, each in separate columns and, after
adding up each column of taxes, the county
assessor shall, in an abstract at the end of each precinct, township,
city, and village list, or other subdivisions of a county, apportion the consolidated
tax among the respective funds to which it belongs, according to the tax levied
for each of such funds, showing a summary of each distinct tax. The county assessor, before transmission
of the tax lists to the county treasurer, shall set up on his or her records
a controlling account, which shall reflect the total tax assessed, against
which the county assessor shall record
the monthly tax collections, as shown by the county treasurer's records.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 140, p. 438;

R.S.1913, § 6460;

Laws 1921, c. 158, § 1, p. 649;

C.S.1922, § 5983;

C.S.1929, § 77-1805;

Laws 1933, c. 136, § 2, p. 517;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-1805;

Laws 1943, c. 175, § 3(2), p. 611;

R.S.1943, § 77-1615;

Laws 1945, c. 189, § 3, p. 585;

Laws 1947, c. 250, § 37, p. 803;

Laws 1949, c. 237, § 1, p. 648;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 217;

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 95;

Laws 2012, LB897, § 1.
July 19, 2012